Tennessee, session 114, HB1714.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 55, Chapter 21, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
55-21-401. Definitions.
As used in this part, "developmental disability" and "intellectual disability" have
the same meanings as in § 52-1-101.
55-21-402. Development of blue envelope.
(a) The department of safety shall develop and design for a driver with a
developmental or intellectual disability a blue envelope that holds the driver's essential
documents, including a driver license, vehicle registration, and contact card. 55-21-403.
(b) The blue envelope, as described in subsection (a), must include
communication guidelines on the exterior that are tailored to assist a law enforcement
officer in recognizing and adapting the officer's approach when interacting with a driver
with a developmental or intellectual disability.
55-21-404. Requesting a blue envelope.
(a) Beginning on January 1, 2027, a person with a developmental or intellectual
disability may request a blue envelope from a driver services center or county clerk's
office.
HB1714
011098
- 1 -

(b) The department of safety shall ensure blue envelopes are made available
pursuant to this section in each driver services center and county clerk's office in this
state.
55-21-405. Rules.
The department of safety is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate this part.
The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative
Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.
SECTION 2. The headings in this act are for reference purposes only and do not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the Tennessee Code Commission is
requested to include the headings in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011098